Nevada, session 83, AB279.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 370 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall create and maintain on its Internet
website and otherwise make available for public inspection a
directory that lists each vapor product that has been approved by
the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services for
introduction or delivery for introduction into interstate commerce
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387j.
2. The Department shall update the directory as necessary to
correct mistakes and to add or remove a vapor product to keep the
directory in conformity with the requirements of this section.
3. Any determination of the Department not to include in or
to remove from the directory a vapor product is a final decision for
the purposes of judicial review.
Sec. 2. NRS 370.007 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.007 As used in NRS 370.007 to 370.430, inclusive, and
370.505 to 370.530, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, unless the
context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS
370.008 to 370.055, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them
in those sections.
-
*AB279*

– 3 –
Sec. 3. NRS 370.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.025 “Contraband tobacco products” means any:
1. Counterfeit cigarettes;
2. Other counterfeit tobacco product;
3. Cigarettes or “roll-your-own” tobacco offered for sale in this
State by a manufacturer, or cigarettes or “roll-your-own” tobacco of
a brand family or style, that is not listed in the directory created
pursuant to NRS 370.675;
4. Cigarettes bearing a tribal stamp issued by the Department
which are sold or offered for sale at a retail location that is not
located on qualified tribal land; [or]
5. Cigarettes or other tobacco product:
(a) Exported from or imported into this State, or mailed,
shipped, delivered, sold, exchanged, transported, distributed or held
for distribution within the borders of this State by any person in
violation of any of the provisions of this chapter;
(b) In any way held in the possession or constructive possession
of any person not authorized under this chapter to possess or
constructively possess the cigarettes or other tobacco product; or
(c) Being offered for sale in any form other than in an unopened
package in violation of subsection 1 of NRS 202.2493 [.] ; or
6. Vapor product that has not been approved by the United
States Secretary of Health and Human Services for introduction
or delivery for introduction into interstate commerce pursuant to
21 U.S.C. § 387j.
Sec. 4. NRS 370.521 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.521 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2, 4
and 5, a person shall not sell, distribute or offer to sell [cigarettes,] :
(a) Cigarettes to any person who was born after December 31,
2004, unless the sale, distribution or offer to sell occurs on the
premises of a property where gaming is conducted under a
nonrestricted license for gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170;
or
(b) Cigarettes, cigarette paper, any product containing, made or
derived from tobacco, any vapor product, any alternative nicotine
product or any product containing, made or derived from nicotine to
any person under the age of 21 years.
2. A person shall be deemed to be in compliance with the
provisions of subsection 1 if, before the person sells, distributes or
offers to sell to another any item described in subsection 1, the
person:
(a) Demands that the other person present a valid driver’s
license, permanent resident card, tribal identification card or other
written or documentary evidence which shows that the other person
-
*AB279*

– 4 –
was born after December 31, 2004, or is 21 years of age or older [;]
, as applicable;
(b) Is presented a valid driver’s license, permanent resident card,
tribal identification card or other written or documentary evidence
which shows that the other person was born after December 31,
2004, or is 21 years of age or older [;] , as applicable; and
(c) Reasonably relies upon the driver’s license, permanent
resident card, tribal identification card or other written or
documentary evidence presented by the other person.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person
shall not sell, distribute or offer to sell cigarettes, cigarette paper or
other tobacco products to any person under 40 years of age without
first performing age verification through enhanced controls that
utilize a scanning technology or other automated, software-based
system to verify that the person was born after December 31, 2004,
or is 21 years of age or older [.] , as applicable. A person who
violates this subsection is liable for a civil penalty of $100 for each
offense. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a person
selling, distributing or offering to sell cigarettes, cigarette paper or
other tobacco products in a face-to-face transaction that occurs in an
area within a casino where loitering by persons who are under 21
years of age is already prohibited pursuant to NRS 463.350. As used
in this subsection, “casino” means an establishment which holds a
nonrestricted license as defined in NRS 463.0177 and which is
operating 16 or more slot machines together with any other game,
race book or sports pool.
4. The employer of a person who was born after December 31,
2004, or is under 21 years of age , as applicable, may, for the
purpose of allowing the person to handle or transport any item
described in subsection 1 in the course of the person’s lawful
employment, provide an item described in subsection 1 to [the] that
person . [under 21 years of age.]
5. The provisions of this section do not apply to any product
regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration under
Subchapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21
U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
6. A person who violates subsection 1 is liable for a civil
penalty of:
(a) For the first violation within a 24-month period, $100.
(b) For the second violation within a 24-month period, $250.
(c) For the third and any subsequent violation within a 24-month
period, $500.
7. If an employee or agent of a licensee has violated
subsection 1:
-
*AB279*

– 5 –
(a) For the first violation within a 24-month period at the same
premises, the licensee is liable for a civil penalty of $2,500.
(b) For the second violation within a 24-month period at the
same premises, the licensee is liable for a civil penalty of $5,000.
(c) For the third violation within a 24-month period at the same
premises, the licensee is liable for a civil penalty of $7,500.
(d) For the fourth and any subsequent violation within a 24-
month period at the same premises, the licensee is liable for a civil
penalty of $10,000.
8. A peace officer or any person performing an inspection
pursuant to NRS 202.2496 may issue a notice of infraction for a
violation of this section. A notice of infraction must be issued on a
form prescribed by the Department and must contain:
(a) The location at which the violation occurred;
(b) The date and time of the violation;
(c) The name of the establishment at which the violation
occurred;
(d) The signature of the person who issued the notice of
infraction;
(e) A copy of the section which allegedly is being violated;
(f) Information advising the person to whom the notice of
infraction is issued of the manner in which, and the time within
which, the person must submit an answer to the notice of infraction;
and
(g) Such other pertinent information as the peace officer or
person performing the inspection pursuant to NRS 202.2496
determines is necessary.
9. A notice of infraction issued pursuant to subsection 8 or a
facsimile thereof must be filed with the Department and retained by
the Department and is deemed to be a public record of matters
which are observed pursuant to a duty imposed by law and is prima
facie evidence of the facts alleged in the notice.
10. A person to whom a notice of infraction is issued pursuant
to subsection 8 shall respond to the notice by:
(a) Admitting the violation stated in the notice and paying to the
State of Nevada the applicable civil penalty set forth in subsection 3,
6 or 7.
(b) Denying liability for the infraction by notifying the
Department and requesting a hearing in the manner indicated on the
notice of infraction. Upon receipt of a request for a hearing pursuant
to this paragraph, the Department shall provide the person
submitting the request an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to
chapter 233B of NRS.
11. Any money collected by the State of Nevada from a civil
penalty pursuant to this section must be deposited in a separate
-
*AB279*

– 6 –
account in the State General Fund to be used for the enforcement of
this section and NRS 202.2493 and 202.2494.
12. As used in this section, “licensee” means a person who
holds a license issued by the Department pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 5. NRS 202.2493 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.2493 1. A person shall not sell, distribute or offer to sell
cigarettes, any smokeless product made or derived from tobacco or
any alternative nicotine product in any form other than in an
unopened package which originated with the manufacturer and
bears any health warning required by federal law. A person who
violates this subsection shall be punished as provided in chapter 370
of NRS. As used in this subsection, “smokeless product made or
derived from tobacco” means any product that consists of cut,
ground, powdered or leaf tobacco and is intended to be placed in the
oral or nasal cavity.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
owner of a retail establishment shall, whenever any product
containing, made or derived from tobacco, vapor product,
alternative nicotine product or product containing, made or derived
from nicotine is being sold or offered for sale at the establishment,
display prominently at the point of sale:
(a) A notice indicating that:
(1) The sale of [cigarettes,] any product containing, made or
derived from tobacco, vapor product, alternative nicotine product or
product containing, made or derived from nicotine to persons under
21 years of age and the sale of cigarettes at the establishment to a
person born after December 31, 2004, is prohibited by law; and
(2) The retailer may ask for proof of age to comply with this
prohibition; and
(b) At least one sign that complies with the requirements of
NRS 442.340.
 A person who violates this subsection shall be punished by a fine
of not more than $100.
3. The owner of a retail establishment located on the
premises of a property where gaming is conducted under a
nonrestricted license for gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170
shall, whenever any product containing, made or derived from
tobacco, vapor product, alternative nicotine product or product
containing, made or derived from nicotine is being sold or offered
for sale at the establishment, display prominently at the point of
sale:
(a) A notice indicating that:
(1) The sale at the establishment of cigarettes, any product
containing, made or derived from tobacco, vapor product,
alternative nicotine product or product containing, made or
-
*AB279*

– 7 –
derived from nicotine to persons under 21 years of age is
prohibited by law; and
(2) The retailer may ask for proof of age to comply with this
prohibition; and
(b) At least one sign that complies with the requirements of
NRS 442.340.
 A person who violates this subsection shall be punished by a
fine of not more than $100.
4. It is unlawful for any retailer to sell cigarettes through the
use of any type of display:
(a) Which contains cigarettes and is located in any area to which
customers are allowed access; and
(b) From which cigarettes are readily accessible to a customer
without the assistance of the retailer,
 except a vending machine used in compliance with NRS
202.2494. A person who violates this subsection shall be punished
by a fine of not more than $500.
Sec. 6. NRS 202.24935 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.24935 1. It is unlawful for a person to knowingly sell or
distribute [cigarettes, cigarette] through the use of a computer
network, telephonic network or other electronic network:
(a) Cigarette paper, products containing, made or derived from
tobacco, vapor products, alternative nicotine products or products
containing, made or derived from nicotine to a person under the age
of 21 years [through the use of a computer network, telephonic
network or other electronic network.] ; and
(b) Cigarettes to a person born after December 31, 2004.
2. Every person who sells or distributes cigarettes, cigarette
paper, products containing, made or derived from tobacco, vapor
products, alternative nicotine products or products containing, made
or derived from nicotine to an ultimate consumer in this State
through the use of a computer network, telephonic network or
electronic network shall:
(a) Ensure that the packaging or wrapping of the items when
they are shipped is clearly marked with the word “cigarettes” or, if
the items being shipped are not cigarettes, the words “tobacco
products,” “vapor products” or “nicotine products,” as applicable.
(b) Obtain the full name, date of birth and residential address of
the purchaser and perform an age verification through an
independent, third-party age verification service that compares
information available from public records to the personal
information entered by the person during the ordering process that
establishes that the person is over the age of 21 years [.] or was born
on or before December 31, 2004, as applicable.
-
*AB279*

– 8 –
3. Every person who makes sales as described in subsection 2
must certify annually to the Attorney General that the person uses an
independent, third-party age verification service as described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 2.
4. In addition to or in lieu of any other civil or criminal remedy
provided by law, a person who violates this section is subject to:
(a) A civil penalty in an amount not more than $1,000 for each
violation; and
(b) The suspension or revocation of the license of the person by
the Department of Taxation, if the person is licensed pursuant to
chapter 370 of NRS.
5. Any violation of subsection 2 constitutes a deceptive trade
practice for the purpose of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
6. For the purposes of this section, any sale of cigarettes,
cigarette paper, products containing, made or derived from tobacco,
vapor products, alternative nicotine products or products containing,
made or derived from nicotine to a natural person in this State who
does not intend to resell the item constitutes a sale to an ultimate
consumer.
Sec. 7. NRS 202.2496 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.2496 1. As necessary to comply with any applicable
federal law, the Attorney General shall conduct random,
unannounced inspections at locations where products containing,
made or derived from tobacco, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products and products containing, made or derived from nicotine are
sold, distributed or offered for sale to inspect for and enforce
compliance with NRS 202.2493, 202.2494 and 370.521, as
applicable. To the extent possible, an inspection of each location
must be conducted pursuant to this section at least once every 3
years. For assistance in conducting any such inspection, the
Attorney General may contract with:
(a) Any sheriff’s department;
(b) Any police department; or
(c) Any other person who will, in the opinion of the Attorney
General, perform the inspection in a fair and impartial manner.
2. If the inspector desires to enlist the assistance of a child
under the age of 18 for such an inspection, the inspector shall obtain
the written consent of the child’s parent for such assistance.
3. A person assisting in an inspection pursuant to this section
shall, if questioned about his or her age, state his or her true age.
4. If a person under 21 years of age is assisting in an inspection
pursuant to this section, the person supervising the inspection shall:
(a) Refrain from altering or attempting to alter the appearance of
the person to make the person appear to be 21 years of age or older.
-
*AB279*

– 9 –
(b) Photograph the person attempting to purchase an item
described in subsection 1 immediately before the inspection is to
occur and retain any photographs taken of the person pursuant to
this paragraph.
5. If a person who was born after December 31, 2004, is
assisting in the inspection of a location where cigarettes are sold,
distributed or offered for sale, other than the premises of a
property where gaming is conducted under a nonrestricted license
for gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170, the person
supervising the inspection shall:
(a) Refrain from altering or attempting to alter the appearance
of the person to make the person appear to have been born on or
before December 31, 2004.
(b) Photograph the person attempting to purchase an item
described in subsection 1 immediately before the inspection is to
occur and retain any photographs taken of the person pursuant to
this paragraph.
6. The person supervising an inspection [using the assistance of
a person under 21 years of age] described in subsection 4 or 5 shall,
within a reasonable time after the inspection is completed:
(a) Inform a representative of the business establishment from
which the person attempted to purchase an item described in
subsection 1 that an inspection has been performed and the results of
that inspection.
(b) Prepare a report regarding the inspection. The report must
include the following information:
(1) The name of the person who supervised the inspection
and that person’s position;
(2) The age and date of birth of the person who assisted in
the inspection;
(3) The name and position of the person from whom the
person who assisted in the inspection attempted to purchase an item
described in subsection 1;
(4) The name and address of the establishment at which the
person attempted to purchase an item described in subsection 1;
(5) The date and time of the inspection; and
(6) The result of the inspection, including whether the
inspection resulted in the sale, distribution or offering for sale of an
item described in subsection 1 to the person under 21 years of age
[.] or who was born after December 31, 2004, as applicable.
[6.] 7. No administrative, civil or criminal action based upon
an alleged violation of NRS 202.2493, 202.2494 or 370.521 may be
brought as a result of an inspection for compliance in which the
assistance of a person under 21 years of age has been enlisted to
attempt to purchase an item described in subsection 1 , or in which
-
*AB279*

– 10 –
the assistance of a person who was born after December 31, 2004,
has been enlisted to purchase cigarettes, unless the inspection has
been conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section.
Sec. 8. NRS 244.3572 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.3572 1. A board of county commissioners may adopt an
ordinance to establish an offense related to tobacco that may include
provisions which prohibit a [child] person who [is] :
(a) Is under the age of [18] 21 years from:
[(a)] (1) Purchasing or attempting to purchase tobacco products;
[(b)] (2) Possessing or attempting to possess tobacco products;
[(c)] (3) Using tobacco products; or
[(d)] (4) Falsely representing that he or she is [18] 21 years of
age or older to purchase, possess or obtain tobacco products.
(b) Was born after December 31, 2004, from:
(1) Purchasing or attempting to purchase cigarettes, except
on the premises of a property where gaming is conducted under a
nonrestricted license for gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170;
(2) Possessing or attempting to possess cigarettes, except on
the premises of a property where gaming is conducted under a
nonrestricted license for gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170;
(3) Smoking cigarettes, except on the premises of a property
where gaming is conducted under a nonrestricted license for
gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170; or
(4) Falsely representing that he or she was born on or
before December 31, 2004, to purchase, possess or obtain
cigarettes.
2. An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must provide
that the provisions of the ordinance do not apply to a [child] person
who is under the age of [18] 21 years or was born after
December 31, 2004, as applicable, and who is:
(a) Assisting in an inspection pursuant to NRS 202.2496;
(b) Handling or transporting tobacco products in the course of
his or her lawful employment;
(c) Handling or transporting tobacco products in the presence of
his or her parent, spouse or legal guardian who is [18] 21 years of
age or older [;] or was born on or before December 31, 2004, as
applicable; or
(d) Possessing or using tobacco products for an established
religious purpose.
3. As used in this section, “tobacco products” means cigarettes,
cigarette paper, tobacco of any description or products made or
derived from tobacco. As used in this subsection, the term “products
made or derived from tobacco” does not include any product
regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration
-
*AB279*

– 11 –
pursuant to Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act,
21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
Sec. 9. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 8, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB279*